test/src/morphology/N-aeqggwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äʼggõz: # Noun 182 'eng /est äke/fin' - full paradigm
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Nom: äʼggõz
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Gen: äʼggõ
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Par: äʼggõzt
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Dat: äʼggõn
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Ins: äʼggõks
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Ill: [äʼggõz, äʼggõ]
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Ela: äʼggõst
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Nom: äʼggõd
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Gen: äʼggõd
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Par: äʼggidi
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Dat: äʼggõdõn
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Ins: äʼggõdõks
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Ill: äʼggiž
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Ela: äʼggist
